North Dakota, session 69, SB2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-13-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
25-13-01.1. Definitions.
For purposes ofAs used in this chapter "service:
1. "Assistance animal" means an animal, other than a service animal, that works,
performs tasks, or provides therapeutic emotional support for an individual with a
disability.
2. "Health care provider" means an individual or facility licensed, certified, or otherwise
authorized by law to administer health care, for profit or otherwise, in the ordinary
course of business or professional practice.
3. "Health care services" means services rendered by a health care provider within the
scope of the provider's license.
4. "Service animal" means anya dog trained to do work, perform tasks, or provide
assistance for the benefit of an individual with a disability. The term includes a dog
trained to provide assistance toassist an individual with a disability, pull by pulling a
wheelchair, lendlending balance support, retrieveretrieving dropped objects, or
provideproviding assistance in a medical crisis.
5. "Therapeutic relationship" means the rendering of health care services by a health
care provider in good faith and with actual knowledge of an individual's disability and
Page No. 1 25.0247.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the individual's disability - related need of an assistance animal. The term does no t
include services provided by a person that issues a certificate, license, letter, or similar
document purporting to confirm the individual has a disability or a disability - related
need for an assistance animal without conducting an assessment of an individual's
disability or an individual's disability - related need for an assistance animal .
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 25-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Health care provider documentation - Requirements - Prohibited acts - Penalty .
1. A health care provider may not produce documentation relating to an individual's need
for an assistance animal unless the health care provider:
a. Is actively licensed to practice medicine in the state;
b. Is qualified and licensed to evaluate and diagnose disabilities and has performed
a disability assessment on the individual for which documentation is produced;
c. Has engaged with the individual in - person or remotely in at least two sessions
before issuing documentation determining the individual requires an assistance
animal; and
d. Performs a clinical evaluation of the individual no less than thirty days before
producing documentation regarding the individual's need for an assistance
animal.
2. Documentation issued by a health care provider regarding an individual's need for an
assistance animal must include:
a. The effective date of the documentation;
b. The license number of the health care provider;
c. The type of professional license held by the health care provider; and
d. Evidence establishing a therapeutic relationship with the individual no less than
thirty days before producing the documentation regarding the individual's need
for an assistance animal.
3. A health care provider may not represent or attempt to represent that an individual has
a disability requiring an assistance animal when an individual is not disabled or does
not need an assistance animal on account of the individual's disability.
Page No. 2 25.0247.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. An individual may not represent or attempt to represent to a third party that the
individual has a disability requiring an assistance animal when the individual is not
disabled or does not require an assistance animal on account of the individual's
disability.
5. Any person in violation of this section is guilty of an infraction for a first offense and a
class B misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense .
6. This section may not be construed to restrict or modify any federal or state laws
relating to an individual's rights for reasonable accommodation and equal access to
housing, including rights afforded in accordance with the Fair Housing Act [Pub . L .
90 - 284; 82 Stat. 81; 42 U.S.C. 3601, et seq.] and the Americans with Disabilities Ac t
[Pub . L. 101 - 336; 104 Stat. 327; 42 U.S.C 12101 et seq.] .
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 25-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Sale of assistance animals - Notice requirements - Penalty .
1. A person selling, providing an animal for use as an assistance animal, or providing a
certificate or letter certifying an animal for use as an assistance animal shall provide a
written notice to the buyer or recipient of the animal stating the assistance animal:
a. Does not have the special training required to qualify as a service animal; and
b. Is not entitled to the rights and privileges accorded by law to a service animal.
2. The written notice under subsection 1 must be printed in bold in at least twelve - poin t
typeface.
3. A person violating this section is guilty of an infraction for a first offense and a class B
misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.
4. This section does not restrict or modify any federal or state laws relating to an
individual's rights for reasonable accommodation and equal access to housing,
including rights afforded in accordance with the Fair Housing Act [Pub . L. 90 - 284; 82
Stat. 81; 42 U.S.C. 3601, et seq.] and the Americans with Disabilities Act [Pub . L .
101 - 336; 104 Stat. 327; 42 U.S.C 12101 et seq.] .
Page No. 3 25.0247.01000